Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-663
Snowmobile, defined.

Snowmobile shall mean a self-propelled motor vehicle designed to travel on snow or ice or a natural terrain steered by wheels, skis, or runners and propelled by a belt-driven track with or without steel cleats.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 159.